Utah statutes.
58-67-305.   Exemptions from licensure.

In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the following individuals may engage in the described acts or practices without being licensed under this chapter:

(1)  an individual rendering aid in an emergency, when no fee or other consideration of value for the service is charged, received, expected, or contemplated;

(2)  an individual administering a domestic or family remedy;

(3) (a) (i)  a person engaged in the sale of vitamins, health foods, dietary supplements, herbs, or other products of nature, the sale of which is not otherwise prohibited by state or federal law; and

(ii)  a person acting in good faith for religious reasons, as a matter of conscience, or based on a personal belief, when obtaining or providing any information regarding health care and the use of any product under Subsection (3)(a)(i); and

(b)  Subsection (3)(a) does not:

(i)  allow a person to diagnose any human disease, ailment, injury, infirmity, deformity, pain, or other condition; or

(ii)  prohibit providing truthful and non-misleading information regarding any of the products under Subsection (3)(a)(i);

(4)  a person engaged in good faith in the practice of the religious tenets of any church or religious belief, without the use of prescription drugs;

(5)  an individual authorized by the Department of Health under Section 26-1-30, to draw blood pursuant to Subsection 41-6a-523(1)(a)(vi), 53-10-405(2)(a)(vi), or 72-10-502(5)(a)(vi);

(6)  a medical assistant while working under the direct and immediate supervision of a licensed physician and surgeon, to the extent the medical assistant is engaged in tasks appropriately delegated by the supervisor in accordance with the standards and ethics of the practice of medicine;

(7)  an individual engaging in the practice of medicine when:

(a)  the individual is licensed in good standing as a physician in another state with no licensing action pending and no less than 10 years of professional experience;

(b)  the services are rendered as a public service and for a noncommercial purpose;

(c)  no fee or other consideration of value is charged, received, expected, or contemplated for the services rendered beyond an amount necessary to cover the proportionate cost of malpractice insurance; and

(d)  the individual does not otherwise engage in unlawful or unprofessional conduct;

(8)  an individual providing expert testimony in a legal proceeding; and

(9)  an individual who is invited by a school, association, society, or other body approved by the division to conduct a clinic or demonstration of the practice of medicine in which patients are treated, if:

(a)  the individual does not establish a place of business in this state;

(b)  the individual does not regularly engage in the practice of medicine in this state;

(c)  the individual holds a current license in good standing to practice medicine issued by another state, district or territory of the United States, or Canada;

(d)  the primary purpose of the event is the training of others in the practice of medicine; and

(e)  neither the patient nor an insurer is billed for the services performed.

